Oklahoma, session 2025, SB663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 22, 2nd
Extraordinary Session, O.S.L. 2022, as amended by Section 1, Chapter
437, O.S.L. 2024 (62 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 255.4), is amended to
read as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce Workforce Commission to
be designated the "Workforce Coordination Revolving Fund". The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies directed for deposit by law from the
Statewide Recovery Fund in Section 255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Commission for
the purpose of creating a workforce data integration system,

providing grants for critical workforce needs, and administering
these projects. No funds shall be used for expenses that violate
the federal guidelines for the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021,
Public Law No. 117-2, or be used for projects not in accordance with
policy enacted under the efforts of the Education and Economic
Development Working Group within the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. Any funds remaining in the Workforce Coordination Revolving
Fund as of July 1, 2024, are hereby considered obligated by the
Oklahoma Legislature for the purpose of workforce development
initiatives.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 663 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 663 Page 3